Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6386.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5. As used in this act: (a) "Efficient electrification measure" means an electric appliance or equipment installed in an existing building to electrify, in whole or in part, space heating, water heating, cooling, drying, cooking, industrial processes, or another building or industrial end use that would otherwise be served by combustion of fossil fuel on the premises and that meets best-practice standards for cost-effective energy efficiency as determined by the commission. Efficient electrification measure includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (i) A cold-climate air-source heat pump. (ii) An electric clothes dryer. (iii) A ground-source heat pump. (iv) High-efficiency electric cooking equipment. (v) A heat pump or high-efficiency electric water heater. (b) "Efficient electrification measures plan" means a plan to offer and promote efficient electrification measures. (c) "Efficient electrification measures program" means a program to implement an efficient electrification measures plan. (d) "Electric provider" means any of the following: (i) Any person or entity that is regulated by the commission for the purpose of selling electricity to retail customers in this state. (ii) A municipally owned electric utility in this state. (iii) A cooperative electric utility in this state. (iv) Except as used in subpart C of part 2, an alternative electric supplier licensed under section 10a of 1939 PA 3, MCL 460.10a. (e) "Eligible electric generator" means a methane digester or renewable energy system with a generation capacity limited to 110% 300% of the customer's electricity consumption for the previous 12 months. (f) "Energy conservation" means the reduction of customer energy use through the installation of measures or changes in energy usage behavior. (g) "Energy efficiency" means a decrease in customer consumption of electricity or natural gas achieved through measures or programs that target customer behavior, equipment, devices, or materials without reducing the quality of energy services. (h) "Energy star" means the voluntary partnership among the United States Department of Energy, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, product manufacturers, local utilities, and retailers to help promote energy efficient products by labeling with the energy star logo, educate consumers about the benefits of energy efficiency, and help promote energy efficiency in buildings by benchmarking and rating energy performance. (i) "Energy storage system" means any technology that is capable of absorbing energy, storing the energy for a period of time, and redelivering the energy. Energy storage system does not include either of the following: (i) Fossil fuel storage. (ii) Power-to-gas storage that directly uses fossil fuel inputs. (j) "Energy waste reduction", subject to subdivision (k), means all of the following: (i) Energy efficiency. (ii) Load management, to the extent that the load management reduces provider costs. (iii) Energy conservation, but only to the extent that the decreases in the consumption of electricity produced by energy conservation are objectively measurable and attributable to an energy waste reduction plan. (k) Energy waste reduction does not include electric provider infrastructure projects that are approved for cost recovery by the commission other than as provided in this act. (l) "Energy waste reduction credit" means a credit certified pursuant to under section 87 that represents achieved energy waste reduction. (m) "Energy waste reduction plan" means a plan under section 71. (n) "Energy waste reduction standard" means the minimum energy savings required to be achieved under section 77. (o) "Federal approval" means approval by the applicable regional transmission organization or other Federal Energy Regulatory Commission-approved transmission planning process of a transmission project that includes the transmission line. Federal approval may be evidenced in any of the following manners: (i) The proposed transmission line is part of a transmission project included in the applicable regional transmission organization's board-approved transmission expansion plan. (ii) The applicable regional transmission organization has informed the electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company that a transmission project submitted for an out-of-cycle project review has been approved by the applicable regional transmission organization, and the approved transmission project includes the proposed transmission line. (iii) If, after October 6, 2008, the applicable regional transmission organization utilizes another approval process for transmission projects proposed by an electric utility, affiliated transmission company, or independent transmission company, the proposed transmission line is included in a transmission project approved by the applicable regional transmission organization through the approval process developed after October 6, 2008. (iv) Any other Federal Energy Regulatory Commission-approved transmission planning process for a transmission project. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05438'25) or House Bill No. 6385 (request no. H05438'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.